Florida, session 2026, SB1114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPart IV of chapter 760, Florida Statutes, 15 consisting of s. 760.80, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 16 Section 2.âPart V of chapter 760, Florida Statutes, 17 consisting of s. 760.854, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 18 Section 3.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 19 1001.216, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 20 1001.216âCouncil on the Social Status of Black Men and 21 Boys.â 22 (1)âThe Council on the Social Status of Black Men and Boys 23 is established within Florida Memorial University and shall be 24 composed of 19 members appointed as follows: 25 (k)âA businessperson who is an African American, as defined 26 in s. 760.80(2)(a), appointed by the Governor. 27 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.